Washington statutes.
RCW 2.04.092

Salary of justices.

The annual salary of justices of the supreme court shall be established by the Washington citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials. No salary warrant may be issued to a justice of the supreme court until the justice files with the state treasurer an affidavit that no matter referred to the justice for opinion or decision has been uncompleted or undecided for more than six months.

[ 1986 c 155 s 4; 1984 c 258 s 401.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—Severability—1986 c 155: See notes following RCW 43.03.300.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Salaries of judicial officers: State Constitution Art. 4 ss 13, 14; Art. 28 s 1; Art. 30 s 1.

Washington citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials: RCW 43.03.305.